test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kiiskw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kīskõ: # Verb 56 'eng /est kiskuda/fin' - full paradigm
     kīskõ+V+Inf: kīskõ
     kīskõ+V+Ger: kīskõs
     kīskõ+V+Sup: kīskõm
     kīskõ+V+Sup+Ine: kīskõmõs
     kīskõ+V+Sup+Ela: kīskõmõst
     kīskõ+V+Sup+Tra: kīskõmõks
     kīskõ+V+Sup+Abe: kīskõmõt
     kīskõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kīskõb
     kīskõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kīskõt
     kīskõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kīskõbõd
     kīskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kīskiz
     kīskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kīskizt, kīskiztõ]
     kīskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kīskizt, kīskiztõ]
     kīskõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kīsk
     kīskõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kīskõks
     kīskõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kīsk
     kīskõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kīsk
     kīskõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kīskõgid
     kīskõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kīskõg
     kīskõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kīskiji
     kīskõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kīskõn
     kīskõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kīstõd
